Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1058.
do enact as follows:SB1058,11Section 1. 704.086 of the statutes is created to read:SB1058,2,32704.086 Reporting tenants’ positive rental payment information. (1) 3Definitions. In this section:SB1058,2,44(a) “Consumer report” has the meaning given in 15 USC 1681a (d).SB1058,2,55(b) “Consumer reporting agency” has the meaning given in 15 USC 1681a (f).SB1058,2,86(c) “Nationwide consumer reporting agency” has the meaning given for 7“consumer reporting agency that compiles and maintains files on consumers on a 8nationwide basis” under 15 USC 1681a (p).SB1058,2,129(d) “Positive rental payment information” means information regarding a 10tenant’s complete and timely payment of rent. “Positive rental payment 11information” does not include information regarding an instance in which a tenant 12did not make a complete and timely payment of rent.SB1058,3,213(2) Reporting positive rental payment information. (a) A landlord shall 14provide to each named tenant on a residential lease an offer for the landlord to 15report that tenant’s positive rental payment information to at least one nationwide 16consumer reporting agency or at least one consumer reporting agency that resells or 1otherwise furnishes rental payment information to a nationwide consumer 2reporting agency.SB1058,3,63(b) 1. For a tenant whose lease is entered into on or after July 1, 2026, a 4landlord shall provide the offer described under par. (a) to the tenant at the time 5that the tenant and the landlord enter into the lease, and shall again provide the 6offer to the tenant at least once annually thereafter for the duration of the lease.SB1058,3,1072. For a tenant whose active or future lease was entered into before July 1, 82026, a landlord shall provide the offer described under par. (a) to the tenant no 9later than July 1, 2026, and shall again provide the offer to the tenant at least once 10annually thereafter for the duration of the lease.SB1058,3,1211(c) The landlord shall provide the offer described under par. (a) to a tenant in 12at least one of the following manners:SB1058,3,15131. In writing by first-class U.S. mail, if the landlord includes in the mailing a 14self-addressed, postage-paid envelope that the tenant can use to return the tenant’s 15written acceptance of the landlord’s offer.SB1058,3,19162. In writing by email, if sent to the email address the tenant has represented 17to the landlord as the tenant’s current email address and if the landlord includes in 18the email message a description of how the tenant can electronically accept the 19landlord’s offer.SB1058,3,2120(d) The landlord shall include in the offer described under par. (a) all of the 21following:SB1058,3,23221. A statement that the landlord’s reporting of the tenant’s positive rental 23payment information is an offer that is optional for the tenant to accept.SB1058,4,212. The amount of the fee that the landlord will charge the tenant for reporting 2the tenant’s positive rental payment information in accordance with sub. (3).SB1058,4,533. Subject to subd. 5., a statement that the tenant may elect to have the 4landlord report the tenant’s positive rental payment information at any time for the 5duration of the tenant’s lease with the landlord.SB1058,4,864. A statement that the tenant may at any time, and instructions for how the 7tenant may, elect in writing to stop the landlord from reporting positive rental 8payment information.SB1058,4,1395. A statement that, if a tenant accepts the landlord’s offer under par. (a) and 10the tenant subsequently requests that the landlord stop reporting the tenant’s 11positive rental payment information, the tenant may only reelect to have the 12landlord begin to report the information again after 6 months from the last time the 13tenant elected to stop the landlord from reporting the information.SB1058,4,16146. An identification of each consumer reporting agency or national consumer 15reporting agency to which the landlord would report the tenant’s positive rental 16payment information.SB1058,4,20177. Instructions for the tenant regarding how the tenant may accept the 18landlord’s offer made under par. (a). The method by which a tenant may submit his 19or her acceptance of the landlord’s offer shall include a signature block that the 20tenant shall date and physically or electronically sign.SB1058,4,22218. Instructions for how a tenant may request that the landlord stop reporting 22the tenant’s positive rental payment.SB1058,4,2423(e) A tenant shall not be required to accept a landlord’s offer described under 24par. (a).SB1058,5,21(f) A tenant may elect to accept the landlord’s offer described under par. (a) at 2any time following the initial offer by the landlord.SB1058,5,83(g) If a tenant elects to accept a landlord’s offer described under par. (a) and 4the tenant subsequently requests that the landlord stop reporting the tenant’s 5positive rental payment information, the landlord shall comply with the the 6tenant’s request as soon as is practicable, and the tenant may only reelect to have 7the landlord begin to report the information again after 6 months from the last time 8the tenant elected to stop the landlord from reporting the information.SB1058,5,119(h) Upon request from a tenant, a landlord shall provide to a tenant a copy of 10the tenant’s written acceptance of the offer the landlord provided in accordance 11with par. (a).SB1058,5,1712(i) Upon a tenant’s acceptance of a landlord’s offer made under par. (a), a 13landlord shall on as regular a basis as the tenant is required to make rent payments 14report that tenant’s positive rental payment information to at least one nationwide 15consumer reporting agency or at least one consumer reporting agency that resells or 16otherwise furnishes rental payment information to a nationwide consumer 17reporting agency.SB1058,5,2418(3) Fee assessed for reporting positive rental payment information. 19(a) A landlord that reports a tenant’s positive rental payment information as a 20result of a tenant’s acceptance of the landlord’s offer provided in accordance with 21sub. (2) (a) may require the tenant to pay a fee not to exceed the actual cost to the 22landlord to report the information or $10 per month, whichever is less. If a landlord 23does not incur a cost in reporting the information, the landlord shall not charge the 24tenant a fee for reporting the information.SB1058,6,31(b) The landlord shall not report to a consumer reporting agency or national 2consumer reporting agency a tenant’s payment or nonpayment of a fee described 3under par. (a).SB1058,6,64(c) An amount tendered by a tenant in full or partial satisfaction of rent or any 5other obligation under the tenant’s lease shall not be applied or credited to a fee 6assessed in accordance with par. (a).SB1058,6,117(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a tenant’s failure to 8pay a fee assessed in accordance with par. (a) shall not, regardless of the terms of 9the lease, constitute a breach of the tenant’s lease, and the tenant’s failure to pay 10the fee shall not constitute a permissible cause for termination of the tenant’s 11tenancy.SB1058,6,1312(e) A landlord may not deduct from a tenant’s security deposit an unpaid fee 13assessed in accordance with par. (a).SB1058,6,1814(f) If a tenant does not pay a fee assessed by the landlord in accordance with 15par. (a) for 30 days or more, the tenant’s landlord may stop reporting the tenant’s 16positive rental payment information, and the tenant may only reelect to have the 17landlord begin to report the information again after 6 months from the day that the 18tenant was due to pay the fee.SB1058,6,2119(g) A landlord may not assess a fee for the reporting of a tenant’s positive 20rental payment information if the tenant has not accepted the landlord’s offer made 21under par. (a).SB1058,7,522(4) Entitlement to rent abatement not forfeited. (a) A tenant who 23elects to accept a landlord’s offer under sub. (2) (a) does not forfeit his or her 24entitlement to rent abatement as authorized under s. 704.07 (4), rent abatement in 1accordance with a local rent abatement ordinance authorized under s. 704.07 (5), or 2rent abatement rules promulgated by the department of agriculture, trade and 3consumer protection, and the absence of rent abated in accordance with any of these 4provisions from a tenant’s rental payment shall not negatively affect whether the 5tenant’s rental payment is considered positive rental payment information.SB1058,7,76(b) Nothing in this section relieves a landlord of the landlord’s legal 7obligations to provide a habitable premise.SB1058,7,108(5) Exemptions. (a) This section does not apply to a landlord of a residential 9rental building that contains 15 or fewer dwelling units, unless both of the following 10apply to the landlord:SB1058,7,11111. The landlord owns more than one residential rental building of any size.SB1058,7,14122. The landlord is a real estate investment trust as defined in 26 USC 856, a 13corporation, or a limited liability company in which at least one member is a 14corporation.SB1058,7,1815(b) 1. In this paragraph, “rental payment assistance” means any form of 16housing assistance payment from a federal or state agency or local governmental 17unit that, in total, allows the tenant to pay less than 30 percent of the household’s 18gross monthly income in rent.SB1058,7,21192. A landlord is not required to act under this section in regard to a residential 20tenant at any time during which the residential tenant is receiving rental payment 21assistance.SB1058,222Section 2. 704.44 (11) of the statutes is created to read:SB1058,8,223704.44 (11) Waives the responsibilities of the landlord under s. 704.086 or 1allows the landlord to terminate the tenancy of a residential tenant for the failure 2to pay a fee assessed in accordance with s. 704.086 (3) (a).SB1058,8,33